Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4114
Successor guardian or successor conservator;
report; court filing.

(1) Once the Public Guardian is appointed as guardian or
conservator, the office shall make a reasonable effort to locate a successor
guardian or successor conservator. By June 30 and January 1 of each year,
the office shall file an aggregate report with the State Court Administrator
describing its efforts to locate a successor guardian or successor conservator.

(2) Upon location
of a successor guardian or successor conservator, the office shall file a
motion with the court for termination or modification of the guardianship
or conservatorship. Availability of a successor guardian or successor conservator
shall be deemed a change in the suitability of the office for carrying out
its powers and duties under section 30-4105.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 14.